Washington statutes.
RCW 36.160.070

Cultural access program—Alternative administrative arrangements.

A county with a population of less than one million five hundred thousand may contract with the state arts commission formed under chapter 43.46 RCW for the provision of consulting, management, or other administrative services to be provided to its program created under this chapter. Any county creating a program may elect to consolidate administration of such a program with that of the entity or public agency designated by the county creating such a program to perform the functions required under RCW 36.160.110.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 24 s 305.]

NOTES:

Construction—2015 3rd sp.s. c 24: See note following RCW 36.160.030.